North Carolina, session 2025, SB577.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 58-27-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-27-5. Prohibition against payment or receipt of title insurance kickbacks, rebates,
commissions and other payments.
(a) Prohibition. – No person or entity selling real property, or performing services as a
real estate agent, attorney or lender, which services are incident to or a part of any real estate
settlement or sale, shall pay or receive, directly or indirectly, any kickback, rebate, commission
or other payment in connection with the issuance of title insurance for any real property which is
a part of such sale or settlement; nor shall any title insurance company, agency or agent make
any such payment.
(b) Penalty. – Any person or entity violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty
of a Class 2 misdemeanor which may include a fine of not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000).
(c) No persons or entity shall be in violation of this section Exception. – The prohibition
of subsection (a) of this section does not apply if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The payment is made: (i) solely by reason of ownership of stock in a bona fide
title insurance company, agency, or agent. agent or (ii) from an employer to a
bona fide employee, including the payment of a commission for the sale of
title insurance. For purposes of this section, subdivision and in addition to any
other statutory or regulatory requirements, a bona fide title insurance
company, agency or agent is defined to be a company, agency or agent that
passes upon and makes title insurance underwriting decisions on title risks,
including the issuance of title insurance policies, binders and endorsements,
and that maintains a separate and distinct staff and office or offices for such
purposes.
(2) The person or entity purchasing title insurance is not required to use any
particular title insurance company, agency, or agent, except as permitted under
regulations adopted pursuant to the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, 12
U.S.C. § 2607(c)(5).
(3) One of the following applies:
a. The person or entity purchasing title insurance is provided, at the time
of referral, a written disclosure that satisfies the requirements of the
Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, 12 U.S.C. § 2607(c)(4), of the
*S577-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
affiliation between the referring party and the title insurance company,
agency, or agent.
b. The person or entity purchasing title insurance is not provided a
written disclosure satisfying the requirements of sub-subdivision a. of
this subdivision, but the person or entity required to make that
disclosure demonstrates that the failure was unintentional and resulted
from a bona fide error notwithstanding maintenance of procedures that
were reasonably adapted to avoid that error. In any judicial or
administrative proceeding, the person or entity relying upon this
sub-subdivision shall have the burden of proof of establishing its
applicability by a preponderance of the evidence."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 577-First Edition